Colorado statutes. TITLE 11 Financial Institutions
PART 3
RECORDS, REPORTING, AND INFORMATION

11-102-301. Examinations and examiner's reports.

The commissioner shall examine the books and records of every state bank as often as deemed advisable and to the extent required by the banking board, shall make and file in his or her office a correct report in detail disclosing the results of such examination, and shall mail a copy of such report to the bank examined.

The commissioner shall examine, as often as deemed advisable and to the extent required by the banking board, any electronic data processing centers of a state bank or any electronic data processing centers that serve a state bank, without regard to the location of the electronic data processing center; shall make and file in his or her office a correct report in detail disclosing the results of such examination; and shall mail a copy of such report to the data processing centers examined and the state bank that they serve.

The commissioner, if he or she deems it necessary or if required by the banking board, may examine the books and records of the controlling shareholder of a state bank and any affiliated entities of the controlling shareholder, as well as any relationship among the controlling shareholder and its affiliated entities, for the purpose of determining the safety and soundness of the state bank.

If the controlling shareholder or affiliate's records are located outside this state, the controlling shareholder or affiliate shall either make them available to the commissioner at a convenient location within this state or pay the reasonable and necessary expenses for the commissioner or the commissioner's representative to examine the records at the place where they are located.

The commissioner may designate representatives, including comparable officials of the state in which the records are located, to inspect the records on the commissioner's behalf.

If a controlling shareholder or affiliate refuses to permit the commissioner to make an examination, the banking board may fine such controlling shareholder or affiliate an amount not to exceed one thousand dollars for each day any such refusal continues.

In lieu of any examination required by this subsection (3), the commissioner may accept an audit for the previous fiscal year prepared by an independent certified public accountant, independent registered accountant, or other independent qualified person. If the commissioner accepts an audit prepared by such independent person, no costs of the audit shall be borne by the commissioner and all costs of such audit shall remain the obligation of the controlling shareholder or affiliate.

For purposes of this subsection (3):

"Affiliated entity" or "affiliate" means an entity in control of a controlling shareholder or an entity controlled by a controlling shareholder.

"Controlling shareholder" means a shareholder in control of a state bank.

"In control of" means that an entity or shareholder meets the same criteria for acquiring control as is set forth in section 11-102-303 for acquiring control of a state bank.

If the commissioner deems necessary, the commissioner may examine any corporation the majority of the stock of which is owned by a state bank or which corporation is found by the banking board to be controlled by a state bank, but the provisions of this subsection (4) shall not apply when such stock is held in a fiduciary capacity by the bank.

If the banking board finds any officer, director, or employee of any state bank to be dishonest, reckless, incompetent, or acting in violation of this code, it shall, in writing, report the facts regarding such officer, director, or employee to the board of directors of the state bank, and, if the directors of the state bank fail or refuse to take action on such report within ten days, the banking board may, if it deems it advisable, send a copy of such report to the surety on the bond of said officer.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1068, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 2004:

(3)(a) and (3)(f)(I) amended, p. 323, § 4, effective April 7.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 11-2-108 as it existed prior to 2003.

11-102-302. Bank reports to banking board - generally.

Every state bank shall make and file with the banking board not less than three reports during each calendar year according to the form that may be prescribed by the banking board, verified by the oath of either the president, the vice-president, the cashier, or the secretary and attested by the signature of three or more of the directors. Each such report shall exhibit in detail, as may be required by the banking board, the resources and liabilities of the state bank at the close of business on the date specified by the banking board.

Said reports shall be transmitted to the banking board within thirty days after its request.

The banking board has power to call for special reports from any particular state bank if, in the banking board's judgment, the special reports are necessary to establish a full and complete knowledge of the state bank's condition. No such special report, nor any summary of a special report, shall be required to be published. The reports required by, and filed pursuant to, this section shall be in lieu of all others required by law from state banks. Every state bank that fails to comply with this section shall pay to the banking board a penalty in an amount set by the banking board pursuant to section 11-102-104 (11). The banking board, for valid reasons and good cause, may waive such penalty.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1069, § 3, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 11-2-109 as it existed prior to 2003.

11-102-303. Bank reports to banking board - requirements for acquiring control.

As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Person" means an individual, a corporation, a partnership, a trust, or any other legal entity.

"Controlling person" means a person who is in control of a state bank or would be in control of a state bank after a proposed acquisition.

A person shall be deemed to have acquired control of a state bank if, as a result of acquisition, such person:

Directly or indirectly owns, controls, holds with the power to vote, or holds proxies representing twenty-five percent or more of the outstanding voting stock thereof;

Controls in any manner the election of a majority of the directors thereof; or

Exercises a controlling influence over the management or policies thereof.

Whenever a person proposes to acquire control of any state bank, such person shall first make application to the banking board for approval. Without approval from the banking board pursuant to subsection (4) of this section, a person shall be prohibited from making such an acquisition.

An application required by paragraph (a) of this subsection (3) shall contain the following information to the extent that it is known by the person making the application:

The number of shares involved;

The name of each seller or transferor;

The name of each purchaser or transferee;

The name of each beneficial owner if the share or shares are registered in another name;

The purchase price;

Detailed information concerning any loans made in connection with the acquisition;

Such other information concerning the transaction as may be required by the banking board regarding the effect of the transaction upon the control of the state bank involved;

Biographical and financial information concerning each purchaser, controlling person, or person in control of a controlling person participating in the proposed acquisition; and

The name of each controlling person and each person in control of a controlling person participating in the proposed acquisition.

After receipt of an application, the commissioner shall make an investigation, and the banking board shall approve the change of control only after the banking board has determined:

(I) That the person proposing to acquire control is qualified by character, experience, and financial responsibility to control the state bank in a legal and proper manner;

(II) That the interests of the public generally will not be jeopardized by the proposed acquisition; and

(III) That the person proposing to acquire control has satisfied the requirements of subsections (1) to (7) of this section and the other provisions of articles 101 to 109 of this title.

The general assembly declares that the acquisition of control of, or of any ownership interest in, state banks by persons owned or controlled by a country with which it has been determined to be against the national interest to trade without export controls for national security purposes by the president of the United States or another appropriate agency of the federal government as directed by the president pursuant to the "Export Administration Act of 1979", 50 U.S.C. Appendix sec. 2401 et seq., the "International Emergency Economic Powers Act", 50 U.S.C. sec. 1701 et seq., or any rule, order, or decision promulgated in connection therewith, is against the public interest. If the application or the commissioner's investigation indicates that any person seeking to have control of or any ownership interest in a state bank is owned or controlled by such a country, the banking board shall not approve any such change of control.

This section shall not apply to the acquisition of:

Voting proxies acquired in the normal course of business as a result of a proxy solicitation in conjunction with a stockholders' meeting;

Stock held in a fiduciary capacity unless the acquiring person has sole discretionary authority to exercise voting rights with respect thereto;

Stock acquired in securing or collecting, in whole or in part, a debt contracted in good faith or stock acquired through testate or intestate succession or bona fide gift, if the acquirer advises the banking board of such acquisition within thirty days after the acquisition and provides any information required or requested by the banking board or commissioner;

Stock acquired by an underwriter in good faith and without any intent to evade the purpose of this section if the shares are held only for such reasonable period of time as will permit the sale of the shares; or

Pro rata stock dividends.

If the banking board has not acted upon a completed application within sixty days after receipt thereof, unless extended for an additional thirty days by the banking board, such application shall be considered approved.

Whenever any person proposes to acquire control of any state bank and is required by the "Change in Bank Control Act of 1978" (section 7 (j) of the "Federal Deposit Insurance Act", 12 U.S.C. 1817 (j)), as such act may be amended from time to time, to give the appropriate federal banking agency prior written notice of such proposed acquisition, a copy of such notice with supporting information shall be given concurrently to the banking board for information. The banking board may use such information in evaluating applications submitted pursuant to this section and shall submit its recommendations and comments to the appropriate federal regulatory authority in a timely manner.

Any person who becomes a director, executive officer, or other person who, directly or indirectly, is responsible for the management, control, or operations of a state bank shall within ninety days thereafter file a report with the banking board containing: A statement describing any civil or criminal offenses affecting such person's qualification to serve in such capacity with respect to which such person has been found guilty or liable by any federal or state court or federal or state regulatory agency; such biographical information as the banking board requires; and such other information as the banking board requires pursuant to its rules. If any statement contained in such report subsequently becomes inaccurate or misleading in any way, such person shall file an amended report within thirty days after the date on which the statement in the report first becomes inaccurate or misleading. Any person who fails to comply with this subsection (8) shall be required by the banking board to pay a penalty in an amount set by the banking board by rule, which penalty shall not exceed twenty-five dollars per day, and such penalty shall be deposited in the general fund. The banking board, for valid reasons and good cause, may waive such penalty.

If any state bank changes any executive officer, director, or other person who, directly or indirectly, is responsible for the management, control, or operations of the state bank, such changes shall be promptly reported to the banking board, and the state bank shall provide such information concerning such person as may be requested by the banking board on such forms as the banking board may require, including information about the reasons for termination from any prior employment and whether such person was charged or convicted of any civil or criminal offenses enumerated in subsection (8) of this section. No civil liability shall arise for any state bank, its directors, executive officers, employees, or agents, or other persons due to compliance with the requirements of this subsection (9). The purpose of such information is to inform the banking board of the qualifications of such person as they may affect the safety and soundness of the state bank. The information shall be treated as confidential under this code. Any bank that fails to comply with this subsection (9) shall be required to pay a penalty in an amount set by the banking board by rule, which penalty shall not exceed twenty-five dollars per day, and such penalty shall be deposited in the general fund. The banking board, for valid reasons and good cause, may waive such penalty.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1070, § 3, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 11-2-109 as it existed prior to 2003.

11-102-304. Commissioner's annual report - publications.

For each calendar year, the commissioner shall compile and publish an annual report in such form and containing such information as the commissioner may determine necessary to reasonably summarize the operations of the division during such year.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1073, § 3, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 11-2-110 as it existed prior to 2003.

11-102-305. Records.

Information from the records of the division shall be revealed only to members of the banking board, except as follows:

Information may be disclosed if such disclosure is rendered necessary by law.

Any party entitled to appear in a hearing on an application for bank charter shall have access to the applicant's proposed articles or amended articles of incorporation, application for charter, and proposed bylaws.

Subject to subsection (1.5) of this section, the commissioner may exchange information as to the condition of banks or trust companies with the United States comptroller of the currency, bank or financial institution regulatory departments of other states, the federal reserve system and its examiners, the federal deposit insurance corporation and its examiners, and the consumer financial protection bureau and its examiners.

Subject to subsection (1.5) of this section, the commissioner may exchange information obtained from money transmitters with the United States secretary of the treasury, the secretary's designees, the United States attorney general, the attorney general's designee, or other state or United States territorial regulatory agencies pertaining to the condition of money transmitters or compliance with federal money laundering and other financial crimes laws, including, but not limited to, the "Bank Secrecy Act", the "Right to Financial Privacy Act of 1978", the "Money Laundering Control Act of 1986", and the "Annunzio-Wylie Anti-Money Laundering Act".

The commissioner may exchange information as provided by part 2 of article 110 of this title 11.

Notwithstanding any other provision of articles 101 to 109 of this title to the contrary, the commissioner, the commissioner's deputies, and the members of the banking board may disclose any information in the records of the division or acquired by them in the discharge of their duties that is publicly available from the federal deposit insurance corporation, the United States comptroller of the currency, the federal reserve system, or the consumer financial protection bureau or the disclosure of which has been specifically authorized by the board of directors of the financial institution to which such information relates.

(1.5) The commissioner shall not exchange information with any other governmental agency unless the commissioner is reasonably satisfied that the agency is obligated by law or contract to:

Share with the division similar information it may have in its possession; and

Maintain the confidentiality of any exchanged information under conditions that are no less restrictive than those imposed by law upon the division.

Reports of examinations made by the division shall be retained by the division for seven years.

Upon request and upon payment of such reasonable charges as the commissioner shall prescribe, the commissioner shall furnish to any person a certified copy of any document on file with the division that is a public record. Such certified copy shall be admissible in evidence in lieu of the original and shall constitute prima facie evidence of the contents of the original.

The division or the commissioner may inform a licensing agency within the department of regulatory agencies of possible misconduct by a person or entity licensed by said agency, notwithstanding that the division or commissioner learned of the alleged misconduct while discharging their duties under the code. The division and the commissioner may give the licensing agency records or information in their possession relating to the licensee's alleged misconduct.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1073, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 2007:

(1) amended, p. 354, § 1, effective April 2.

L. 2008:

(4) added, p. 181, § 3, effective August 5.

L. 2010:

(1)(a)(IV) amended and (1)(a)(V) added, (HB 10-1114), ch. 192, p. 823, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2013:

(1)(a)(III) and (1)(b) amended, (SB 13-154), ch. 282, p. 1476, § 36, effective July 1.

L. 2017:

(1)(a)(III) and (1)(a)(IV) amended and (1.5) added, (HB 17-1218), ch. 156, p. 534, § 1, effective August 9; (1)(a)(V) amended, (SB 17-226), ch. 159, p. 589, § 7, effective August 9.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 11-2-111 as it existed prior to 2003.

Cross references:

For the "Bank Secrecy Act", see Pub.L. 91-508; for the "Right to Financial Privacy Act of 1978", see Title XI of Pub.L. 95-630, codified at 12 U.S.C. § 3401 et seq.; for the "Money Laundering Control Act of 1986", see Title I, subtitle H, §§ 1351-1367 of Pub.L. 99-570; for the "Annunzio-Wylie Anti-Money Laundering Act", see Title XV of Pub.L. 102-550.

11-102-306. Information confidential.

The banking board, the commissioner, and all deputies and employees of the division shall not divulge any information acquired by them in the discharge of their duties except insofar as disclosure may be rendered necessary or authorized by law, including section 11-102-305 (4).

The banking board, the commissioner, and their designees may exchange information with the United States comptroller of the currency, the federal deposit insurance corporation, the board of governors of the federal reserve system, the consumer financial protection bureau, the federal home loan bank in which an institution is a member or is making an application to become a member, the executive director of the department of regulatory agencies, the division of financial services, and banking or financial institution regulatory agencies of other states or United States territories, subject to any confidentiality agreement entered into between the banking board or the commissioner and the United States comptroller of the currency, the federal deposit insurance corporation, the board of governors of the federal reserve system, the consumer financial protection bureau, regulatory agencies of other states or United States territories, or the federal home loan bank in which an institution is a member or is making an application to become a member. In addition, the banking board, the commissioner, and their designees may exchange information obtained by the banking board relating to:

Possible violations of the federal "Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974", 29 U.S.C. sec. 1001 et seq., with the federal department of labor or the executive director of the department of regulatory agencies;

Possible criminal violations of federal law relating to the activities of a federally insured institution with the federal bureau of investigation or the executive director of the department of regulatory agencies; and

The activities of money transmitters pertaining to compliance with federal money laundering and other financial crimes laws, including the "Bank Secrecy Act", the "Right to Financial Privacy Act of 1978", the "Money Laundering Control Act of 1986", and the "Annunzio-Wylie Anti-Money Laundering Act", with the United States secretary of the treasury or the secretary's designees.

The executive director of the department of regulatory agencies and the state commissioner of financial services and their deputies shall, before entering upon the discharge of their duties specified in this section, in addition to an oath required by the state constitution, take and subscribe an oath to keep secret all information acquired by them in the discharge of such duties, except as may otherwise be required by law. Willful violation of this oath shall be a criminal offense.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this article to the contrary, the commissioner, the deputies, and the members of the banking board may disclose any information in the records of the division of banking or acquired by them within the discharge of their duties that is publicly available from the federal deposit insurance corporation, the United States comptroller of the currency, the federal reserve system, or the consumer financial protection bureau and disclose information that has been specifically authorized by the board of directors of the bank to which such information relates. Nothing in this section authorizes the board of directors of a bank to waive any privileges that belong solely to the banking board, the division, or its employees.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1073, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 2007:

Entire section amended, p. 355, § 2, effective April 2; entire section amended, p. 596, § 7, effective July 1.

L. 2008:

(1) amended, p. 181, § 4, effective August 5.

L. 2013:

IP(2), (2)(c), and (4) amended, (SB 13-154), ch. 282, p. 1476, § 37, effective July 1.

L. 2017:

IP(2) amended, (HB 17-1218), ch. 156, p. 535, § 2, effective August 9.

11-102-307. Access to records.

The commissioner shall have access to any record of the division relating to state banks, and the appointive members of the banking board shall have such access upon the affirmative vote of a majority of the members of the banking board.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1074, § 3, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 11-2-112 as it existed prior to 2003.

11-102-308. Bank records - preservation - reproduction.

Every state bank shall retain its business records for such periods as are prescribed by or in accordance with the terms of this section.

Each state bank shall retain permanently the minute books of meetings of its stockholders and directors, its capital stock ledger and capital stock certificate ledger or stubs, its general ledger (or the record kept by the bank in lieu thereof), its daily statements of condition, and all records that the banking board shall, in accordance with the terms of this section, require to be retained permanently.

All other state bank records shall be retained for such periods as the banking board shall, in accordance with the terms of this section, prescribe.

The banking board shall from time to time issue rules classifying all records kept by state banks and prescribing the period for which records of each class shall be retained. Such periods may be permanent or for a term of years. Such rules may be amended or repealed. Prior to issuing any such rule, the banking board shall consider:

Actions and administrative proceedings in which the production of bank records might be necessary or desirable;

State and federal statutes of limitation applicable to such actions or proceedings;

The availability of information contained in bank records from other sources;

Such other matters as the banking board deems pertinent in order that its rules will require banks to retain their records for such periods as are commensurate with the interests of bank customers and shareholders and of the people of this state in having bank records available.

Any state bank may dispose of any record that has been retained for the period prescribed, in accordance with the terms of this section for retention of records of its class, and shall, after it has disposed of a record, thereafter be under no duty to produce such record in any action or proceeding.

In lieu of retention of the original records, any state bank may cause any of its records and records at any time in its custody, including those held by it as a fiduciary, to be photographed or otherwise reproduced in permanent form. Any such photograph or reproduction shall have the same force and effect as the original and be admitted in evidence equally with the original.

To the extent that they are not in contravention of any statute of the United States or any rule promulgated thereunder, the provisions of this section shall apply to all banks doing business in this state.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1074, § 3, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 11-2-113 as it existed prior to 2003.